Virginia statutes. Title 17.1. Courts of Record.
Article 7. Fees.
§ 17.1-279.
Additional fee to be assessed by circuit court clerks for information technology.

In addition to the fees otherwise authorized by this chapter, the clerk of each circuit court shall assess a $5 fee, known as the “Technology Trust Fund Fee,” in each civil action, upon each instrument to be recorded in the deed books, and upon each judgment to be docketed in the judgment lien docket book. Such fee shall be deposited by the State Treasurer into a trust fund. The State Treasurer shall maintain a record of such deposits.

Four dollars of every $5 fee shall be allocated by the Compensation Board from the trust fund for the purposes of: (i) developing and updating individual land records automation plans for individual circuit court clerks’ offices; (ii) implementing automation plans to modernize land records in individual circuit court clerks’ offices and provide secure remote access to land records throughout the Commonwealth pursuant to §

17.1-294

; (iii) obtaining and updating office automation and information technology equipment including software and conversion services; (iv) preserving, maintaining and enhancing court records, including, but not limited to, the costs of repairs, maintenance, land records, consulting services, service contracts, redaction of social security numbers from land records, and system replacements or upgrades; and (v) improving public access to court records. The Compensation Board in consultation with circuit court clerks and other users of court records shall develop and update policies governing the allocation of funds for these purposes. However, such funds shall not be used for personnel costs within the circuit court clerks’ offices. The Compensation Board policies governing the allocation of funds shall require that a clerk submit to the Compensation Board a written certification that the clerk’s proposed technology improvements of his land records will provide secure remote access to those land records on or before July 1, 2008.The annual budget submitted by each circuit court clerk pursuant to §

15.2-1636.7

may include a request for technology improvements in the upcoming fiscal year to be allocated by the Compensation Board from the trust fund. Such request shall not exceed the deposits into the trust fund credited to that locality. The Compensation Board shall allocate the funds requested by the clerks in an amount not to exceed the deposits into the trust fund credited to their respective localities.

The remaining $1 of each such fee may be allocated by the Compensation Board from the trust fund (i) for the purposes of funding studies to develop and update individual land-records automation plans for individual circuit court clerks’ offices, at the request of and in consultation with the individual circuit court clerk’s offices, and (ii) for the purposes enumerated in subsection B to implement the plan to modernize land records in individual circuit court clerks’ offices and provide secure remote access to land records throughout the Commonwealth. The allocations pursuant to this subsection may give priority to those individual clerks’ offices whose deposits into the trust fund would not be sufficient to implement its modernization plan. The Compensation Board policies governing the allocation of funds shall require that a clerk submit to the Compensation Board a written certification that the clerk’s proposed technology improvements of his land records will provide secure remote access to those land records on or before July 1, 2008.

Secure remote access to land records shall be by paid subscription service through individual circuit court clerk’s offices pursuant to §

17.1-276

, or through designated application service providers. The clerk may require any entity that is a nonresident of the Commonwealth, prior to becoming a subscriber, to demonstrate that such entity is authorized to do business in Virginia and is in good standing with the State Corporation Commission or other applicable state or federal regulatory agency and that such entity will comply with the secure remote access standards developed by the Virginia Information Technologies Agency pursuant to §

17.1-294

. In the case of an individual, the clerk may require a person who is a nonresident of the Commonwealth to demonstrate that such person has a legal presence in Virginia and will comply with the secure remote access standards developed by the Virginia Information Technologies Agency pursuant to §

17.1-294

. Compliance with secure remote access standards developed by the Virginia Information Technologies Agency pursuant to §

17.1-294

shall be certified by the individual circuit court clerks’ offices to the Compensation Board. The individual circuit court clerk’s office or its designated application service provider shall certify compliance with such secure remote access standards. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the clerk from entering into a subscriber agreement with an agency of the Commonwealth and delegating the responsibility for compliance with such secure remote access standards to such agency. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Compensation Board from allocating trust fund money to individual circuit court clerks’ offices for the purpose of complying with such secure remote access standards or redaction of social security numbers from land records.
D. 1. Secure remote access to land records shall be by paid subscription service through individual circuit court clerk’s offices pursuant to §

17.1-276

, or through designated application service providers. The clerk may require any entity that is a nonresident of the Commonwealth, prior to becoming a subscriber, to demonstrate that such entity is authorized to do business in Virginia and is in good standing with the State Corporation Commission or other applicable state or federal regulatory agency and that such entity will comply with the secure remote access standards developed by the Virginia Information Technologies Agency pursuant to § 17.1-294. In the case of an individual, the clerk may require a person who is a nonresident of the Commonwealth to demonstrate that such person has a legal presence in Virginia and will comply with the secure remote access standards developed by the Virginia Information Technologies Agency pursuant to § 17.1-294. Compliance with secure remote access standards developed by the Virginia Information Technologies Agency pursuant to §

17.1-294

shall be certified by the individual circuit court clerks’ offices to the Compensation Board. The individual circuit court clerk’s office or its designated application service provider shall certify compliance with such secure remote access standards. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the clerk from entering into a subscriber agreement with an agency of the Commonwealth and delegating the responsibility for compliance with such secure remote access standards to such agency. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Compensation Board from allocating trust fund money to individual circuit court clerks’ offices for the purpose of complying with such secure remote access standards or redaction of social security numbers from land records.

Every circuit court clerk shall provide secure remote access to land records pursuant to § 17.1-294 on or before July 1, 2008.

Such fee shall not be assessed to any instrument to be recorded in the deed books nor any judgment to be docketed in the judgment lien docket books tendered by any federal, state or local government.

If such an application includes automation or technology improvements that would require an interface with the case management system or the financial management system operated and maintained by the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court for the purpose of providing electronic information to state agencies in accordance with §

17.1-502

, the circuit court clerk, or the court’s designated application service provider, shall certify to the Compensation Board that such automation or technology improvements will comply with the security and data standards of the systems operated and maintained by the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court.

Information regarding the technology programs adopted by the circuit court clerks shall be shared with the Virginia Information Technologies Agency, The Library of Virginia, and the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the duty of local governing bodies to furnish supplies and equipment to the clerks of the circuit courts pursuant to §

15.2-1656

. Revenue raised as a result of this section shall in no way supplant current funding to circuit court clerks’ offices by local governing bodies.

Effective July 1, 2006, except for transfers pursuant to this section, there shall be no transfers out of the Technology Trust Fund, including transfers to the general fund.

History.

1996, c. 431, § 14.1-125.2; 1997, c. 675; 1998, c. 872; 2000, cc. 440, 446; 2002, cc. 140, 250, 637; 2003, cc. 205, 865, 981, 1021; 2004, c. 676; 2005, cc. 681, 738; 2006, c. 647; 2007, cc. 548, 626; 2009, cc. 793, 858; 2010, c. 430; 2014, c. 460.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 647, cl. 2, provides: “That the Virginia Information Technologies Agency is requested to develop methods for the redaction of social security numbers from land record documents maintained in electronic form by offices of circuit court clerks and made available via remote secure access pursuant to §

2.2-3808.2

[see now §§

17.1-293

and

17.1-294

]. The Virginia Information Technologies Agency shall submit to the Compensation Board a project budget and obtain approval of the same, prior to commencement of the work, to be billed in accordance with the required procedures for the Virginia Information Technologies Agency to bill other agencies for its services. The Compensation Board is authorized to pay the Virginia Information Technologies Agency such charges as it deems reasonable and proper for the services from funds collected pursuant to subsection C of §

17.1-279

.”

Acts 2006, c. 907, cl. 2, provides: “That, for the initial development and ongoing maintenance of information technology policies, standards, and guidelines to implement the provisions of this act and Chapter 749 of the 2005 Acts of Assembly, the Virginia Information Technologies Agency shall submit to the Compensation Board a project budget and obtain approval of the same, prior to commencement of the agency’s work, to be billed in accordance with the required procedures for the Virginia Information Technologies Agency to bill other agencies for its services. The Compensation Board is authorized to pay the Virginia Information Technologies Agency such charges as it deems reasonable and proper for the services from funds collected pursuant to subsection B of §

17.1-279

.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 73 E, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §

17.1-279

E, Code of Virginia, the Compensation Board may allocate to the clerk of any circuit court funds for the acquisition of equipment and software for a pilot project for the automated application for, and issuance of, marriage licenses by such court. Any such funds allocated shall be deemed to have been expended pursuant to clause (iii) of §

17.1-279

E for the purposes of the limitation on allocations set forth in that subsection.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 73 F, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides:

“1. Notwithstanding the provisions of §

17.1-279

, Code of Virginia, the Compensation Board may allocate up to $978,426 the first year and $978,426 the second year of Technology Trust Fund moneys for operating expenses in the clerks’ offices.

“2. Notwithstanding the provisions of §

17.1-279

, Code of Virginia, the Compensation Board when distributing funds to the Circuit Court Clerk’s Offices from the Technology Trust Fund shall ensure that each office has at least $1,000 per year for technology related expenditures.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 440 and 446 are identical, and inserted “and other users of court records” near the beginning of the second sentence in subsection B; in subsection C, deleted “by the Task Force; (ii) funding studies by the Department of Information Technology or other public or private organizations” following “(i) funding studies,” inserted “and update,” redesignated former clause (iii) as present clause (ii); and added subsection H.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 140 and 250 are identical, and substituted “2004” for “2002” in subsection H.

The 2002 amendment by c. 637 inserted the last two sentences of subsection E; and substituted “2004” for “2002” in subsection H.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 205 substituted “$3 fee” for “three-dollar fee” throughout the section; and in subsection C, substituted “$1” for “one dollar,” and added the last sentence.

The 2003 amendment by c. 865 substituted “$3 fee” for “three-dollar fee” throughout the section; in subsection C, substituted “$1” for “one”; and in subsection H, substituted “2008” for “2004.”

The 2003 amendments by cc. 981 and 1021 are identical, and substituted “$3” for “three dollar,” and “Virginia Information Technologies Agency” for “Department of Technology Planning” throughout the section; and substituted “$1” for “one dollar” in subsection C.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 676, in subsection A, substituted “$5” for “$3”; in subsection B, substituted “Four dollars of every $5” for “Two dollars of every $3,” inserted clauses (i), (ii), and redesignated former clauses (i) and (ii) as (iii) and (iv), in clause (iv), deleted “which may include, but not necessarily be limited to, a digital imaging system,” and rewrote the last two sentences in the first paragraph of subsection B, which read: “In allocating funds, the Compensation Board may consider the current automation of the Clerks’ offices and the recommendations made in the 1996 report by the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission (JLARC) regarding automation of the circuit court clerks’ offices. Except for improvements as provided in subsection E, such policies shall require a clerk to submit to the Compensation Board a written certification from the Virginia Information Technologies Agency that the clerk’s proposed technology improvements will be compatible with a system to provide statewide remote access to land records in accordance with the recommendations of JLARC and the Task Force on Land Records Management (the Task Force) Established by the Virginia Information Technologies Agency”; in subsection C, rewrote the first sentence and added the last two sentences; rewrote the last sentence of subsection C as the first sentence of subsection D and added the last three sentences in subsection D; redesignated former subsection D as subsection E; rewrote former subsection E and redesignated as subsection F; redesignated former subsections F and G as subsections G and H; deleted former subsection H, which read: “The provisions of this section shall expire on July 1, 2008”; and added subsection I.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 681, effective January 1, 2006, substituted “civil action” for “law and chancery action” in the first sentence of subsection A; and substituted “civil divisions” for “law and chancery divisions” in subsection F.

The 2005 amendment by c. 738 added subsection J.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 647, in the first paragraph of subsection B and in subsection C, substituted “provide” for “accommodate” and “or before July 1, 2007” for “a statewide basis”; in the first sentence in subsection F, substituted “provides” for “has implemented an automation plan for his land records that will accommodate” and “to land records on or before July 1, 2007” for “on a statewide basis”; deleted former subsection I, which read: “It is the intent of the General Assembly that all circuit court clerks provide secure remote access to land records on or before July 1, 2006”; and redesignated former subsection J as subsection I.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 548 and 626 are identical, and substituted “July 1, 2008” for “July 1, 2007” throughout; in subsection B, in the first sentence of the first paragraph, inserted “pursuant to §

17.1-294

” at the end of clause (ii) and in clause (iv), inserted “land records, consulting services” following “maintenance,” “redaction of social security numbers from land records” following “service contracts” and “replacements or” following “system”; and rewrote subsections D and F.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 793 and 858 are identical, and inserted the next-to-last sentence in subsection F; and substituted “Technology Trust Fund” for “fund” in subsection I.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 430, in subdivision D 1, inserted the second and third sentences; deleted former subdivision D 2 concerning reimbursement of expenditures for redacting social security numbers from land records; redesignated former subdivision D 3 as subdivision D 2; in subsection F, deleted the first sentence, which read: “If a circuit court clerk provides secure remote access to land records on or before July 1, 2008, then that clerk may apply to the Compensation Board for an allocation from the Technology Trust Fund for automation and technology improvements in his office that are not related to land records” and deleted the last sentence, which read: “Such request shall not exceed the deposits into the trust fund credited to that locality.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 460 in subdivision D 1 inserted the sixth sentence.

Law Review.

For survey article on judicial decisions in real estate law from June 1, 2002 through June 1, 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 223 (2003).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Technology Trust Fund monies. —

A locality or a circuit court judge does not have the statutory authority to direct how a circuit court clerk uses the Technology Trust Fund monies allocated to such clerk’s office pursuant to §

17.1-279

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John T. Frey, Fairfax County Circuit Court Clerk, 09-055, 2009 Va. AG LEXIS 40 (10/8/09).

§ 17.1-279.1.
Additional assessment for electronic summons system.

Any county, city, or town, through its governing body, may assess an additional sum not in excess of $5 as part of the costs in each criminal or traffic case in the district or circuit courts located where such cases are brought in which the defendant is charged with a violation of any statute or ordinance, which violation in the case of towns arose within the town, and where the defendant is charged with a violation of any such statute or ordinance by a local law-enforcement agency. The imposition of such assessment shall be by ordinance of the governing body, which may provide for different sums in circuit courts and district courts. The assessment shall be collected by the clerk of the court in which the action is filed, remitted to the treasurer of the appropriate county, city, or town, and held by such treasurer subject to disbursements by the governing body to a local law-enforcement agency solely to fund software, hardware, and associated equipment costs for the implementation and maintenance of an electronic summons system. The imposition of a town assessment shall replace any county fee that would otherwise apply.

History.

2014, c. 325; 2015, cc. 546, 643; 2020, c. 342.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 3-6.04, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Nothing in §

17.1-279.1

of the Code of Virginia shall be construed to authorize any county, city, or town to assess the sum set forth therein upon any summons issued by a law-enforcement agency of the Commonwealth.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 546 and 643 are identical, and substituted “county, city, or town” for “county or city” throughout the section; substituted “where such cases are brought” for “within its boundaries” and inserted “which violation in the case of towns arose within the town” in the first sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 342 added “and where the defendant is charged with a violation of any such statute or ordinance by a local law-enforcement agency” at the end of the first sentence.

§ 17.1-280.
What costs chargeable against prosecutor.

If any warrant of arrest for a misdemeanor or felony, or any search warrant, is issued or procured at the instance of a prosecutor, other than a public officer charged with the enforcement of the laws, and the warrant is dismissed or the accused discharged from the charge or charges, the judge before whom the proceeding is held may give judgment against the prosecutor in favor of the accused for his costs. If the judge believes from the evidence that the warrant was procured by the prosecutor through malice or without reasonable and probable cause, the judge shall grant judgment in favor of the accused for his costs.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-140; 1960, c. 369; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-131; 1998, c. 872.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 1-704. Complaint for Malicious Prosecution.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 100.

§ 17.1-281.
Assessment for courthouse construction, renovation or maintenance.

Any county or city, through its governing body, may assess a sum not in excess of two dollars as part of the costs in (i) each civil action filed in the district or circuit courts located within its boundaries and (ii) each criminal or traffic case in its district or circuit court in which the defendant is charged with a violation of any statute or ordinance. If a town provides court facilities for a county, the governing body of the county shall return to the town a portion of the assessments collected based on the number of civil, criminal and traffic cases originating and heard in the town.

The imposition of such assessment shall be by ordinance of the governing body which may provide for different sums in circuit courts and district courts. The assessment shall be collected by the clerk of the court in which the action is filed, remitted to the treasurer of the appropriate county or city and held by such treasurer subject to disbursements by the governing body for the construction, renovation, or maintenance of courthouse or jail and court-related facilities and to defray increases in the cost of heating, cooling, electricity, and ordinary maintenance.

Any county or city which, on or after January 1, 2008, operated a courthouse not in compliance with the current safety and security guidelines contained in the Virginia Courthouse Facility Guidelines, as certified by the Department of General Services upon application to the Department by the county or city, and which cannot be feasibly renovated to correct such non-compliance, through its governing body, may assess an additional sum not in excess of three dollars as part of the costs in (i) each civil action filed in the district or circuit courts located within its boundaries and (ii) each criminal or traffic case in its district or circuit court in which the defendant is charged with a violation of any statute or ordinance. Such additional fee assessed under this subsection shall not be assessed in any civil action if the amount in controversy is $500 or less. Any locality which applies for certification from the Department under this subsection shall reimburse the Department for the actual costs incurred by the Department in complying with the certification request.

The imposition of such assessment shall be by ordinance of the governing body, which may provide for different sums in circuit courts and district courts. The assessment shall be collected by the clerk of the court in which the action is filed, remitted to the treasurer of the appropriate county or city, and held by such treasurer subject to disbursements by the governing body solely for the construction, reconstruction, renovation of, or adaptive re-use of a structure for a courthouse.

The assessments provided for herein shall be in addition to any other fees prescribed by law. The assessments shall be required in each felony, misdemeanor, or traffic infraction case, regardless of the existence of a local ordinance requiring their payment.

History.

1990, c. 543, § 14.1-133.2; 1991, c. 689; 1992, cc. 698, 863; 1998, c. 872; 1999, c. 9; 2002, c. 831; 2009, cc. 814, 857.

The 1999 amendment

added the last sentence of the section.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 831, effective July 1, 2003, inserted “misdemeanor, or traffic infraction case” in the second sentence in the last paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 814 and 857 are nearly the same, and designated the former first, second and third paragraphs as subsections A, B and E, respectively; in subsection A, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “The total assessments authorized by any county or city in a civil action pursuant to this section and §

42.1-70

shall not exceed four dollars”; added subsections C and D; and in subsection E, substituted “assessments” for “assessment” twice and “their payment” for “its payment.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Use of funds to maintain courthouses. —

Funds derived from the fee assessed pursuant to the statute may be used to defray increases in the cost of heating, cooling, electricity, and routine maintenance of courthouses located within the city, but may not be used to pay the entire cost of utilities and routine courthouse maintenance. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Margaret P. Spencer, Judge, Circuit Court of the City of Richmond, 01-028 (4/27/01).

§ 17.1-282.
Reserved.

§ 17.1-283.
Statements required of clerks of courts of record; exceptions.

Every clerk of a court of record, except the Clerks of the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals, shall file monthly with the Compensation Board a full and accurate statement showing all such fees, allowances, commissions, salaries or other compensation or emolument of office, derived from the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof, or from any other source whatever, collected or received by him. The statements shall include the date of collection and sources from which the collections were made, and shall be verified by a procedure agreed upon by the Compensation Board and the Auditor of Public Accounts. The statements shall be open to public inspection at all times.

The statements shall show in detail all sums actually paid for necessary office expenses, premiums on official bond of the principal and deputies, name and amount of compensation to each deputy or assistant, and a detailed statement of every other expense in connection with the administration of the office actually paid out.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 14-145, 14-147, 14-148; 1952, c. 446; 1960, c. 584; 1962, c. 439; 1964, c. 386, §§ 14.1-136, 14.1-138, 14.1-139; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 155; 1983, c. 293; 1996, c. 696; 1998, c. 872.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 73 B, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “The reports filed by each circuit court clerk pursuant to §

17.1-283

, Code of Virginia, for each calendar year shall include all income derived from the performance of any office, function or duty described or authorized by the Code of Virginia whether directly or indirectly related to the office of circuit court clerk, including, by way of description and not limitation, services performed as a commissioner of accounts, receiver, or licensed agent, but excluding private services performed on a personal basis which are completely unrelated to the office. The Compensation Board may suspend the allowance for office expenses for any clerk who fails to file such reports within the time prescribed by law, or when the board determines that such report does not comply with the provisions of this paragraph.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Clerks of Court, § 4.

§ 17.1-284.
How excess payable into state or local treasury determined.

In determining the excess, if any, to be paid into the state treasury by the clerks, all fees, allowances, commissions, salary or other compensation or emolument of office derived from the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof, or from any source whatever, shall be included and enter into the determination of the excess to be paid.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-149; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-140; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-285.
Payment of excess.

The Commonwealth shall be entitled to one-third of the excess fees collected by clerks as required to be reported under §

17.1-283

and the governing body of the county or city shall be entitled to two-thirds of the excess fees collected unless otherwise provided by law. The Compensation Board shall determine on an annual basis by June 30 of each year the methods by which excess fees shall be disbursed.

All of the excess paid into the state treasury by the clerks of the Supreme Court of Virginia and the Court of Appeals shall be retained therein.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-150; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-140.1; 1985, c. 575; 1998, c. 872.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 780, § 3-5.05, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 836, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2018, provides: “Notwithstanding §§

15.2-540

,

15.2-639

,

15.2-848

,

17.1-285

, and any other provision of law general or special, effective July 1, 2009, the Commonwealth shall be entitled to two-thirds of the excess fees collected by the clerks of the circuit courts as required to be reported under §

17.1-283

.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 3-5.05, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding § §

15.2-540

,

15.2-639

,

15.2-848

,

17.1-285

, and any other provision of law general or special, effective July 1, 2009, the Commonwealth shall be entitled to two-thirds of the excess fees collected by the clerks of the circuit courts as required to be reported under §

17.1-283

.”

§ 17.1-286.
Disposition of state funds locally collected.

All state funds collected by clerks of courts shall be paid into the state treasury without deductions on account of their compensation or on account of expenses. The Comptroller shall promptly forward to such officers his warrants on the State Treasurer for the compensation due them and the estimated amount allowed them out of such funds for expenses.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-161; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-161; 1998, c. 872.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 266 B, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

17.1-286

and

58.1-3176

, Code of Virginia, the State Comptroller shall not make payments to the Circuit Court clerks on amounts directly deposited into the State Treasury by General District Courts, Juvenile and Domestic Relations General District Courts, Combined District Courts, and the Magistrates System. The State Comptroller shall continue to make payments, in accordance with §§

17.1-286

and

58.1-3176

, Code of Virginia, to the respective clerks on those amounts directly deposited into the state treasury by the Circuit Courts.”

§ 17.1-287.
Salaries of clerks of circuit courts.

The annual salaries of clerks of circuit courts shall be as prescribed in the general appropriation act.

History.

1982, c. 589, § 14.1-143.2; 1986, c. 370; 1988, c. 841; 1998, c. 872.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 73 G, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding §

17.1-287

, Code of Virginia, any elected official funded through this Item may elect to relinquish any portion of his state funded salary established in paragraph A 1 of this Item. In any office where the official elects this option, the Compensation Board shall ensure the amount relinquished is used to fund salaries of other office staff.”

§ 17.1-288.
Compensation and expenses of clerks of circuit courts in Cities of Richmond and Newport News.

In the City of Richmond and in the City of Newport News, the clerk of the circuit court shall be paid a salary by the city of not less than the amount which would be allowed to be retained by the respective clerks under state law. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prevent such clerks from receiving any future increases that may be allowed clerks of circuit courts from time to time by the General Assembly.

Such salaries shall be in full compensation for services and shall be in lieu of the retention by such clerks of any and all official fees, commissions and emoluments of whatever kind or character, and from whatever source derived; and the city council of each such city shall provide for the payment of such salaries out of the city treasury in equal biweekly, semimonthly or monthly installments. The expenses of office of such clerks, including the compensation of all deputies and employees, shall likewise be paid to each such clerk out of the city treasury on duly authenticated vouchers when and as such expenses are incurred or may become due and payable or at least monthly. The maximum amount of such expenses shall be fixed by the Compensation Board, and the Board shall fix the number and compensation of the deputies and employees of each such clerk.

All fees, commissions, and emoluments of every kind or character received or collected by such clerks, and from whatever source derived, shall be paid into the city treasury by such clerks monthly. All fees, commissions, and emoluments of every kind and character whether payable by the Commonwealth, the United States, or by private persons, firms or corporations, now or hereafter made receivable by laws or ordinance by such clerks, shall continue to be paid to and collected by such clerks and shall be paid into the city treasury monthly, except that the city aforesaid shall not be required to pay any such clerk any fees or commissions for services performed for such city.

Except as to the Clerk of the Circuit Court of the City of Newport News, nothing in this section shall be construed to affect or remove any of such clerks, their deputies, or employees from coverage by the Virginia Retirement System, but they shall remain in such system, and the city shall pay to the Virginia Retirement System such amount as the Commonwealth would have been required to pay had such clerks, deputies and employees continued to be compensated under other provisions of former Article 3 (§ 14.1-136 et seq.) of Chapter 2 of Title 14.1, and the city shall deduct from the salaries paid such clerks, their deputies and employees the employee contribution to the Virginia Retirement System as provided by law.

History.

1970, c. 382, § 14.1-144.1; 1973, c. 544; 1981, c. 14; 1983, c. 580; 1998, c. 872.

Editor’s note.

Former Article 3 (§ 14.1-136 et seq.), referred to in the last paragraph, was recodified as §

17.1-283

et seq. by Acts 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-289.
Commission on certain local collections not otherwise provided for.

The clerk of every circuit court shall be entitled to a commission of five percent on local collections received by the clerk on which a commission is not otherwise provided for by law. The commissions shall be deducted by the clerk before the collections are paid into the county, town or city treasury.

History.

1977, c. 290, § 14.1-155.2; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-290.
Contracts by cities.

Subject to the approval of the Compensation Board, the council of any city may enter into contracts with officers providing for salaries for the maximum amount allowed in §

17.1-287

and for the city’s pro rata part of the expense of the office approved by the State Compensation Board, in lieu of fees and commissions prescribed by law for services performed for the city and such contracts may relieve the officer from collecting such fees and commissions. In the event such contract is entered into and approved by the Compensation Board, the officer and the city shall not be liable to the Commonwealth for the failure of such officer to collect fees and commissions prescribed by law for services rendered the city. A copy of every such contract, certified by the clerk of the city council, shall be filed with the Comptroller.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-162; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-162; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-291.
Penalty for officers.

Any officer failing to comply with the duties imposed upon him by the provisions of this article shall forfeit to the Commonwealth not less than $25 nor more than $500 for each such failure, such forfeiture to be enforced by the attorney for the Commonwealth in the circuit court having criminal jurisdiction in his city or county.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-163; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-163; 1972, c. 170; 1998, c. 872.